Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 509. COMMUNITY JUSTICE ASSISTANCE DIVISION

Sec. 509.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Community corrections facility" means a physical structure, established by the judges described by Section 76.002 after authorization of the establishment of the structure has been included in a department's strategic plan, that is operated by the department or operated for the department by an entity under contract with the department, for the purpose of treating persons who have been placed on community supervision or who are participating in a pretrial intervention program operated under Section 76.011 or a drug court program established under Chapter 123 or former law and providing services and programs to modify criminal behavior, deter criminal activity, protect the public, and restore victims of crime. The term includes:

(A) a restitution center;

(B) a court residential treatment facility;

(C) a substance abuse treatment facility;

(D) a custody facility or boot camp;

(E) a facility for an offender with a mental impairment, as defined by Section 614.001, Health and Safety Code; and

(F) an intermediate sanction facility.

(2) "Department" means a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76.

(3) "Division" means the community justice assistance division.

(4) "State aid" means funds appropriated by the legislature to the division to provide financial assistance to:

(A) the judges described by Section 76.002 for:

(i) a department established by the judges;

(ii) the development and improvement of community supervision services and community-based correctional programs;

(iii) the establishment and operation of community corrections facilities; and

(iv) assistance in conforming with standards and policies of the division and the board; and

(B) state agencies, counties, municipalities, and nonprofit organizations for the implementation and administration of community-based sanctions and programs.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.23(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 255 (H.B. 1326), Sec. 9, eff. May 30, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2791), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 2.11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 977 (H.B. 351), Sec. 5(c), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 509.002. PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1) allow localities to increase their involvement and responsibility in developing sentencing programs that provide effective sanctions for criminal defendants;

(2) provide increased opportunities for criminal defendants to make restitution to victims of crime through financial reimbursement or community service;

(3) provide increased use of community penalties designed specifically to meet local needs; and

(4) promote efficiency and economy in the delivery of community-based correctional programs consistent with the objectives defined by Section 1.02, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 509.003. STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES. (a) The division shall propose and the board shall adopt reasonable rules establishing:

(1) minimum standards for programs, community corrections facilities and other facilities, equipment, and other aspects of the operation of departments;

(2) a list and description of core services that should be provided by each department;

(3) methods for measuring the success of community supervision and corrections programs, including methods for measuring rates of diversion, program completion, and recidivism;

(4) a format for strategic plans; and

(5) minimum standards for the operation of substance abuse facilities and programs funded through the division.

(b) In establishing standards relating to the operation of departments, the division shall consider guidelines developed and presented by the advisory committee on community supervision and corrections department management to the judicial advisory council established under Section 493.003(b).

(c) A substance abuse facility or program operating under the standards is not required to be licensed or otherwise approved by any other state or local agency.

(d) The division shall develop a screening and evaluation procedure for use in accordance with Section 76.017. The division shall determine if a single screening and evaluation procedure may be used in each program. If the division determines that a single procedure is not feasible, the division shall identify and approve procedures that may be used.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.24(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1269, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 509.004. RECORDS, REPORTS, AND INFORMATION SYSTEMS. (a) The division shall require each department to:

(1) keep financial and statistical records determined necessary by the division;

(2) submit a strategic plan and all supporting information requested by the division;

(3) present data requested by the division as necessary to determine the amount of state aid for which the department is eligible;

(4) submit periodic financial audits and statistical reports to the division; and

(5) submit to the Department of Public Safety the full name, address, date of birth, social security number, and driver's license number of each person restricted to the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with a device that uses a deep-lung breath analysis mechanism to make impractical the operation of the motor vehicle if ethyl alcohol is detected in the breath of the restricted operator.

(b) The division shall develop an automated tracking system that:

(1) is capable of receiving tracking data from community supervision and corrections departments' caseload management and accounting systems;

(2) is capable of tracking the defendant and the sentencing event at which the defendant was placed on community supervision by name, arrest charge code, and incident number;

(3) provides the division with the statistical data it needs to support budget requests and satisfy requests for information; and

(4) is compatible with the requirements of Chapter 66, Code of Criminal Procedure, and the information systems used by the institutional division and the pardons and paroles division of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(c) The division shall prepare a report that contains a summary of the programs and services provided by departments, as described in each strategic plan submitted to the division under Section 509.007.

(d) As soon as is practicable after the completion of the report, the division shall submit the report prepared under Subsection (c) to the Texas Board of Criminal Justice and the executive director of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(e) Not later than the date on which the Texas Department of Criminal Justice is required to submit the department's legislative appropriations request to the Legislative Budget Board, the division shall submit the report prepared under Subsection (c) to the Legislative Budget Board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.25(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1007, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (H.B. 3691), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1074 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2931), Sec. 4.13, eff. January 1, 2019.

Sec. 509.0041. USE OF RISK AND NEEDS ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENT. The division shall require each department to use the risk and needs assessment instrument adopted by the Texas Department of Criminal Justice under Section 501.0921 to assess each defendant at the time of the defendant's initial placement on community supervision and at other times as required by the comprehensive reentry and reintegration plan adopted under Section 501.092.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 509.005. INSPECTIONS; AUDITS; EVALUATIONS. The community justice assistance division shall from time to time inspect and evaluate and the internal audit division may at any reasonable time conduct an audit of the financial, program compliance, or performance records of a department to determine:

(1) compliance with the division's rules and standards;

(2) economical and efficient use of resources;

(3) accomplishment of goals and objectives;

(4) reliability and integrity of information; and

(5) safeguarding of assets.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.26(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 509.006. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS FACILITIES. (a) To establish and maintain community corrections facilities, the division may:

(1) fund division-managed facilities;

(2) fund contracts for facilities that are managed by departments, counties, or vendors;

(3) provide funds to departments for the renovation of leased or donated buildings for use as facilities;

(4) accept ownership of real property pursuant to an agreement under which the division agrees to construct a facility and offer the facility for lease;

(5) allow departments, counties, or municipalities to accept and use buildings provided by units of local governments, including rural hospital districts, for use as facilities;

(6) provide funds to departments, counties, or municipalities to lease, purchase, or construct buildings or to lease or purchase land or other real property for use as facilities, lease or purchase equipment necessary for the operation of facilities, and pay other costs as necessary for the management and operation of facilities; and

(7) be a party to a contract for correctional services or approve a contract for those services if the state, on a biennial appropriations basis, commits to fund a portion of the contract.

(b) The division may require that community corrections facilities comply with state and local safety laws and may develop standards for:

(1) the physical plant and operation of community corrections facilities;

(2) programs offered by community corrections facilities;

(3) disciplinary rules for residents of community corrections facilities; and

(4) emergency furloughs for residents of community corrections facilities.

(c) Minimum standards for community corrections facilities must include requirements that a facility:

(1) provide levels of security appropriate for the population served by the facility, including as a minimum a monitored and structured environment in which a resident's interior and exterior movements and activities can be supervised by specific destination and time; and

(2) accept only those residents who are physically and mentally capable of participating in any program offered at the facility that requires strenuous physical activity, if participation in the program is required of all residents of the facility.

(d) Standards developed by the division that relate to state jail felony facilities must meet minimum requirements adopted by the board for the operation of state jail felony facilities. The board may adopt rules and procedures for the operation of more than one type of state jail felony facility.

(e) With the consent of the department operating or contracting for the operation of the facility, the board may designate any community corrections facility that is an intermediate sanction facility as a state jail felony facility and confine state jail felons in that facility.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 509.007. STRATEGIC PLAN. (a) The division shall require as a condition to payment of state aid to a department or county under Section 509.011 that a strategic plan be submitted for the department. The department shall submit the plan required by this subsection. A department may not submit a plan under this section unless the plan is first approved by the judges described by Section 76.002 who established the department. The department shall submit a revised plan to the division each even-numbered year not later than March 1. A plan may be amended at any time with the approval of the division.

(b) A strategic plan required under this section must include:

(1) a statement of goals and priorities and of commitment by the department and the judges described by Section 76.002 who established the department to achieve a targeted level of alternative sanctions;

(2) a description of methods for measuring the success of programs provided by the department or provided by an entity served by the department;

(3) a summary of the programs and services the department provides or intends to provide, including a separate summary of:

(A) any services the department intends to provide in relation to a specialty court program; and

(B) any programs or other services the department intends to provide to enhance public safety, reduce recidivism, strengthen the investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses, improve programs and services available to victims of crime, and increase the amount of restitution collected from persons supervised by the department; and

(4) an outline of the department's projected programmatic and budgetary needs, based on the programs and services the department both provides and intends to provide.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 255 (H.B. 1326), Sec. 10, eff. May 30, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (H.B. 3691), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1074 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 1.07, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 509.0071. COMMITMENT REDUCTION PLAN. (a) In addition to submitting a strategic plan to the division under Section 509.007, a department or a regional partnership of departments may submit a commitment reduction plan to the division not later than the 60th day after the date on which the time for gubernatorial action on the state budget has expired under Section 14, Article IV, Texas Constitution.

(b) A commitment reduction plan submitted under this section may contain a request for additional state funding in the manner described by Subsection (e). A commitment reduction plan must contain:

(1) a target number by which the county or counties served by the department or regional partnership of departments will, relative to the number of individuals committed in the preceding state fiscal year from the county or counties to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for offenses not listed in or described by Article 42A.054, Code of Criminal Procedure, reduce that number in the fiscal year for which the commitment reduction plan is submitted by reducing the number of:

(A) direct sentencing commitments;

(B) community supervision revocations; or

(C) direct sentencing commitments and community supervision revocations;

(2) a calculation, based on the most recent Criminal Justice Uniform Cost Report published by the Legislative Budget Board, of the savings to the state that will result from the county or counties reaching the target number described by Subdivision (1);

(3) an explanation of the programs and services the department or regional partnership of departments intends to provide using any funding received under Subsection (e)(1), including any programs or services designed to enhance public safety, reduce recidivism, strengthen the investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses, improve programs and services available to victims of crime, and increase the amount of restitution collected from persons supervised by the department or regional partnership of departments;

(4) a pledge by the department or regional partnership of departments to provide accurate data to the division at the time and in the manner required by the division;

(5) a pledge to repay to the state, not later than the 30th day after the last day of the state fiscal year in which the lump-sum award is made, a percentage of the lump sum received under Subsection (e)(1) that is equal to the percentage by which the county or counties fail to reach the target number described by Subdivision (1), if the county or counties do not reach that target number; and

(6) if the commitment reduction plan is submitted by a regional partnership of departments, an agreement and plan for the receipt, division, and administration of any funding received under Subsection (e).

(c) For purposes of Subsection (b)(5), if the target number contained in the commitment reduction plan is described by Subsection (b)(1)(B), the county or counties fail to reach the target number if the sum of any increase in the number of direct sentencing commitments and any reduction in community supervision revocations is less than the target number contained in the commitment reduction plan.

(d) A pledge described by Subsection (b)(4) or (5) must be signed by:

(1) the director of the department submitting the commitment reduction plan; or

(2) if the commitment reduction plan is submitted by a regional partnership of departments, a director of one of the departments in the regional partnership submitting the commitment reduction plan.

(e) After reviewing a commitment reduction plan, if the division is satisfied that the plan is feasible and would achieve desirable outcomes, the division may award to the department or regional partnership of departments:

(1) a one-time lump sum in an amount equal to 35 percent of the savings to the state described by Subsection (b)(2); and

(2) on a biennial basis, and from the 65 percent of the savings to the state that remains after payment of the lump sum described by Subdivision (1), the following incentive payments for the department's or regional partnership's performance in the two years immediately preceding the payment:

(A) 15 percent, for reducing the percentage of persons supervised by the department or regional partnership of departments who commit a new felony while under supervision;

(B) five percent, for increasing the percentage of persons supervised by the department or regional partnership of departments who are not delinquent in making any restitution payments; and

(C) five percent, for increasing the percentage of persons supervised by the department or regional partnership of departments who are gainfully employed, as determined by the division.

(f) A department or regional partnership of departments may use funds received under Subsection (e) to provide any program or service that a department is authorized to provide under other law, including implementing, administering, and supporting evidence-based community supervision strategies, electronic monitoring, substance abuse and mental health counseling and treatment, specialized community supervision caseloads, intermediate sanctions, victims' services, restitution collection, short-term incarceration in county jails, specialized courts, pretrial services and intervention programs, and work release and day reporting centers.

(g) Any funds received by a department or regional partnership of departments under Subsection (e):

(1) are in addition to any per capita or formula funding received under Section 509.011; and

(2) may not be deducted from any per capita or formula funding received or to be received by:

(A) another department, if the commitment reduction plan is submitted by a department; or

(B) any department, if the commitment reduction plan is submitted by a regional partnership of departments.

(h) The division shall deduct from future state aid paid to a department, or from any incentive payments under Subsection (e)(2) for which a department is otherwise eligible, an amount equal to the amount of any pledge described by Subsection (b)(5) that remains unpaid on the 31st day after the last day of the state fiscal year in which a lump-sum award is made under Subsection (e)(1). If the lump-sum award was made to a regional partnership of departments, the division shall deduct, in accordance with the agreement and plan described by Subsection (b)(6), the amount of the unpaid pledge from the future state aid to each department that is part of the partnership or from any incentive payments under Subsection (e)(2) for which the regional partnership of departments is otherwise eligible.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (H.B. 3691), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1074 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.57, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 509.008. OFFICER CERTIFICATION. (a) The division shall establish officer certification programs for department residential officers and department supervision officers. A program must include coursework relating to the proper performance of the officer's duties and an examination prepared by the division administered at the conclusion of the coursework. The examination must test officers on knowledge required for the proper performance of their duties. An officer who satisfactorily completes the coursework and examination shall be certified.

(b) Except as provided by Subsections (d), (e), and (f), a department may not continue to employ an officer unless the officer was exempt from certification requirements on September 1, 1989, or satisfactorily completes the coursework and examination required by this section not later than the first anniversary of the date on which the officer begins employment with the department.

(c) The division shall provide adequate notification of the results of examinations and provide other relevant information regarding examinations as requested by examinees.

(d) The division may extend the period for the coursework and examination requirements for an officer under Subsection (b) or (f) for an additional period not to exceed one year because:

(1) the department has a need to increase hiring to reduce caseloads to a level necessary to receive full state aid; or

(2) an extenuating circumstance, as determined by the division director, prevents the officer from completing the coursework and examination within the required period.

(e) The division may waive certification requirements other than a fee requirement for an applicant with a valid certificate from another state that has certification requirements substantially similar to those of this state.

(f) A department may not continue to employ a residential officer unless the officer successfully completes the coursework and examination requirement under this section before the first anniversary of the date on which the officer begins the officer's assignment to a residential facility.

(g) The division may deny, revoke, or suspend a certification or may reprimand an officer for a violation of a standard adopted under this chapter.

(h) If the division proposes to deny, revoke, or suspend an officer's certification or to reprimand an officer, the officer is entitled to a hearing before the division or a hearings examiner appointed by the division. The division shall adopt procedures for appeals by officers of decisions made by the division to deny, revoke, or suspend a certification or to reprimand an officer.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.27(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 509.009. TRAINING. The division may provide pre-service, in-service, and educational training and technical assistance to departments to promote compliance with the standards under this chapter and to assist departments in improving the operation of department services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 509.010. PUBLIC MEETING. (a) The division may not take an action under Sections 509.006(a)(1) through (6) relating to a community corrections facility established after August 31, 1989, unless a public meeting is held about the proposed action before the action is taken.

(b) Before the 30th day before the date of the meeting, the division, the department that the facility is to serve, or a vendor proposing to operate the facility shall:

(1) publish by advertisement that is not less than 3-1/2 inches by 5 inches notice of the date, hour, place, and subject of the hearing required by Subsection (a) in three consecutive issues of a newspaper of, or in newspapers that collectively have, general circulation in the county in which the proposed facility is to be located; and

(2) mail a copy of the notice to each police chief, sheriff, city council member, mayor, county commissioner, county judge, school board member, state representative, and state senator who serves or represents the area in which the proposed facility is to be located, unless the proposed facility has been previously authorized to operate at a particular location as part of a community justice plan submitted by a community justice council under Section 509.007.

(c) If a private vendor, other than a private vendor that operates as a nonprofit corporation, proposes to operate a facility that is the subject of a public meeting under this section, the private vendor is responsible for the costs of providing notice and holding the public meeting required by this section.

(d) In describing the subject of a hearing for purposes of publishing notice under this section, the notice must specifically state the address of the facility on which a proposed action is to be taken and describe the proposed action.

(e) The division, a department, or a private vendor shall hold a public meeting required by Subsection (a) at a site as close as practicable to the location at which the proposed action is to be taken. The division, department, or vendor may not hold the meeting on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday and must begin the meeting after 6 p.m.

(f) A department, a county, a municipality, or a combination involving more than one of those entities may not take an action under Section 76.010 unless the entity or entities hold a public meeting before the action is taken, with notice provided and the hearing to be held in the same manner as provided by Subsections (a) through (e).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 478, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 509.011. PAYMENT OF STATE AID. (a) If the division determines that a department complies with division standards and if the department has submitted a strategic plan under Section 509.007 and the supporting information required by the division and the division determines the plan and supporting information are acceptable, the division shall prepare and submit to the comptroller vouchers for payment to the department as follows:

(1) for per capita funding, a per diem amount for each felony defendant directly supervised by the department pursuant to lawful authority;

(2) for per capita funding, a per diem amount for a period not to exceed 182 days for each defendant supervised by the department pursuant to lawful authority, other than a felony defendant; and

(3) for formula funding, an annual amount as computed by multiplying a percentage determined by the allocation formula established under Subsection (f) times the total amount provided in the General Appropriations Act for payments under this subdivision.

(a-1) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 346 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(b) The division may use discretionary grant funds to further the purposes of this chapter by contracting for services with state agencies or nonprofit organizations. The division may also make discretionary grants to departments, municipalities, or counties for the following purposes:

(1) development and operation of pretrial and presentencing services;

(2) electronic monitoring services, surveillance supervision programs, and controlled substances testing services;

(3) research projects to evaluate the effectiveness of community corrections programs, if the research is conducted in cooperation with the Criminal Justice Policy Council;

(4) contract services for felony defendants;

(5) residential services for misdemeanor defendants who exhibit levels of risk or needs indicating a need for confinement and treatment, as described by Section 509.005(b);

(6) establishment or operation of county correctional centers under Subchapter H, Chapter 351, Local Government Code, or community corrections facilities for which the division has established standards under Section 509.006;

(7) development and operation of treatment alternative to incarceration programs under Section 76.017; and

(8) other purposes determined appropriate by the division and approved by the board.

(b-1) The division may award a grant to a department for the development and operation of a pretrial intervention program for defendants who are:

(1) pregnant at the time of placement into the program; or

(2) the primary caretaker of a child younger than 18 years of age.

(c) Each department, county, or municipality shall deposit all state aid received from the division in a special fund of the county treasury or municipal treasury, as appropriate, to be used solely for the provision of services, programs, and facilities under this chapter or Subchapter H, Chapter 351, Local Government Code.

(d) The division shall provide state aid to each department on a biennial basis, pursuant to the strategic plan for the biennium submitted by the department. A department with prior division approval may transfer funds from one program or function to another program or function.

(e) In establishing per diem payments authorized by Subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2), the division shall consider the amounts appropriated in the General Appropriations Act for basic supervision as sufficient to provide basic supervision in each year of the fiscal biennium.

(f) The division annually shall compute for each department for community corrections program formula funding a percentage determined by assigning equal weights to the percentage of the state's population residing in the counties served by the department and the department's percentage of all felony defendants in the state under direct community supervision. The division shall use the most recent information available in making computations under this subsection. The board by rule may adopt a policy limiting for all departments the percentage of benefit or loss that may be realized as a result of the operation of the formula.

(g) If the Texas Department of Criminal Justice determines that at the end of a biennium a department maintains in reserve an amount greater than six months' basic supervision operating costs for the department, the Texas Department of Criminal Justice in the succeeding biennium may reduce the amount of per capita and formula funding provided under Subsection (a) so that in the succeeding biennium the department's reserves do not exceed six months' basic supervision operating costs. The Texas Department of Criminal Justice may adopt policies and standards permitting a department to maintain reserves in an amount greater than otherwise permitted by this subsection as necessary to cover emergency costs or implement new programs with the approval of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice. The Texas Department of Criminal Justice may distribute unallocated per capita or formula funds to provide supplemental funds to individual departments to further the purposes of this chapter.

(h) A community supervision and corrections department at any time may transfer to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice any unencumbered state funds held by the department. The Texas Department of Criminal Justice may distribute funds received from a community supervision and corrections department under this subsection to provide supplemental funds to individual departments to further the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.28(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1.39, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1030, Sec. 2.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 255 (H.B. 1326), Sec. 11, eff. May 30, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 346 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1230 (H.B. 1374), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 509.012. REFUSAL OR SUSPENSION OF STATE AID. (a) The division shall take one or more of the following actions against a department that the division determines is not in substantial compliance with division standards or requirements adopted under Sections 509.003 through 509.006:

(1) a reduction, refusal, or suspension of payment of state aid to the department; or

(2) an imposition of budget control over the department.

(b) The board shall provide for notice and a hearing in cases in which the division proposes to take an action authorized by this section, other than a refusal by the division to provide discretionary grant funding or a reduction by the division of discretionary grant funding during a funding cycle. The division shall define with specificity the conduct that constitutes substantial noncompliance with division standards and shall establish the procedures to be used in imposing or waiving a sanction authorized by this section, subject to approval of the definition and the procedures by adoption by the board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 509.013. GRANT PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION. (a) In this section, "grant program" means a grant program administered by the division through which the division awards grants to departments through an application process.

(b) The division shall:

(1) establish goals for each grant program that are consistent with the purposes described by Section 509.002 and the mission of the division;

(2) establish grant application, review, award, and evaluation processes;

(3) establish the process by which and grounds on which an applicant may appeal a decision of the division regarding a grant application;

(4) establish and maintain a system to routinely monitor grant performance;

(5) establish and make available to the public:

(A) all criteria used in evaluating grant applications; and

(B) all factors used to measure grant program performance;

(6) publish on the division's Internet website for each grant awarded:

(A) the amount awarded;

(B) the method used in scoring the grant applications and the results of that scoring; and

(C) additional information describing the methods used to make the funding determination; and

(7) require each department to submit program-specific outcome data for the division's use in making grant awards and funding decisions.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 509.014. STUDY REGARDING PERFORMANCE-BASED FUNDING. (a) The division shall:

(1) review the funding formulas specified under Section 509.011 and study the feasibility of adopting performance-based funding formulas, including whether the formulas should take into consideration an offender's risk level or other appropriate factors in allocating funding; and

(2) make recommendations for modifying the current funding formulas.

(b) In conducting the study and making recommendations under Subsection (a), the division shall:

(1) seek input from departments, the judicial advisory council established under Section 493.003(b), and other relevant interest groups; and

(2) in consultation with the Legislative Budget Board, determine the impact of any recommendations on the allocation of the division's funds as projected by the Legislative Budget Board.

(c) The division shall include in the reports prepared under Sections 509.004(c) and 509.016(c):

(1) the findings of the study;

(2) any recommendations regarding modifying the funding formulas; and

(3) the projected impact of the recommendations on the allocation of the division's funds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 509.015. TREATMENT STANDARDS FOR CERTAIN STATE JAIL FELONIES. The division shall propose and the board shall adopt best practices standards for substance abuse treatment conditions imposed under Article 42A.554(c), Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1122, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.58, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 509.016. PRISON DIVERSION PROGRESSIVE SANCTIONS PROGRAM. (a) The division shall provide grants to selected departments for the implementation of a system of progressive sanctions designed to reduce the revocation rate of defendants placed on community supervision. The division shall give priority in providing grants to departments that:

(1) serve counties in which the revocation rate for defendants on community supervision significantly exceeds the statewide average or historically has significantly exceeded the statewide average; or

(2) have demonstrated success, through the implementation of a system of progressive sanctions, in reducing the revocation rate of defendants placed on community supervision.

(b) In determining which departments are proper candidates for grants under this section, the division shall give preference to departments that present to the division a plan that will target medium-risk and high-risk defendants and use progressive sanction models that adhere to the components set forth in Section 469.001, Health and Safety Code. As a condition to receiving a grant, a department must offer a plan that contains some if not all of the following components:

(1) an evidence-based assessment process that includes risk and needs assessment instruments and clinical assessments that support conditions of community supervision or case management strategies;

(2) reduced and specialized caseloads for supervision officers, which may include electronic monitoring or substance abuse testing of defendants;

(3) the creation, designation, and fiscal support of courts and associated infrastructure necessary to increase judicial oversight and reduce revocations;

(4) increased monitoring and field contact by supervision officers;

(5) shortened terms of community supervision, with increased supervision during the earliest part of the term;

(6) strategies that reduce the number of technical violations;

(7) improved coordination between courts and departments to provide early assessment of defendant needs at the outset of supervision;

(8) graduated sanctions and incentives, offered to a defendant by both the departments and courts served by the department;

(9) the use of inpatient and outpatient treatment options, including substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, and cognitive and behavioral programs for defendants;

(10) the use of intermediate sanctions facilities;

(11) the use of community corrections beds;

(12) early termination strategies and capabilities;

(13) gang intervention strategies; and

(14) designation of faith-based community coordinators who will develop faith-based resources, including a mentoring program.

(c) The division shall, not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, provide a report to the board. The report must state the number of departments receiving grants under this section, identify those departments by name, and describe for each department receiving a grant the components of the department's program and the success of the department in reducing revocations. The report must also contain an analysis of the scope, effectiveness, and cost benefit of programs funded by grants provided under this section and a comparison of those programs to similar programs in existence in various departments before March 1, 2005. The division may include in the report any other information the division determines will be beneficial to the board or the legislature. The board shall forward the report to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives not later than December 15 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 799 (S.B. 166), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 509.017. SPECIAL ALLOCATION FOR CERTAIN DEFENDANTS PLACED ON STATE JAIL FELONY COMMUNITY SUPERVISION. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall adopt policies and procedures to:

(1) determine the cost savings to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice realized through the release of defendants on community supervision under Article 42A.551(d)(2)(B), Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) provide 30 percent of that cost savings to the division to be allocated to individual departments and used for the same purpose that state aid is used under Section 509.011.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1195 (S.B. 1173), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.59, eff. January 1, 2017.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (e).

Sec. 509.018. FAMILY VIOLENCE PRETRIAL DIVERSION PILOT PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "family violence" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.004, Family Code.

(b) To reduce rates of family violence recidivism, the division shall collaborate with judges in Bexar County who have jurisdiction over cases involving family violence to establish a family violence pretrial diversion pilot program for individuals who are charged with an offense involving family violence and who suffer from a substance abuse disorder or chemical dependency.

(c) The pretrial diversion pilot program developed under this section shall include:

(1) assessment instruments to accurately analyze the needs of pilot program participants;

(2) a comprehensive substance abuse disorder and chemical dependency treatment program that includes case managers, clinicians, peer mentors, or recovery coaches;

(3) in collaboration with law enforcement agencies, a procedure to rapidly respond to pilot program participants who fail to comply with pilot program requirements, including, when appropriate, immediate removal from the pilot program; and

(4) the use of a video teleconferencing system in court to facilitate the cooperation of witnesses in the criminal justice system and to reduce costs associated with transporting defendants.

(d) The division shall review the pilot program established under this section and submit a report to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the legislature not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year. The report must include:

(1) a summary of the status and results of the pilot program;

(2) an analysis of the effectiveness of the pilot program in reducing the rate of family violence recidivism among individuals charged with an offense involving family violence and suffering from a substance abuse disorder or chemical dependency;

(3) sources of funding available to extend the pilot program to other counties or for a longer period of time, including available local, state, and federal funding sources; and

(4) any legislative or other recommendations.

(e) This section expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 896 (H.B. 3529), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 551 (H.B. 4333), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.